Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB700.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 150.740 is amended to read as follows:
(1) There shall be a ban on the importation of live members of the animal family
Cervidae into the Commonwealth that have not been subject to a program of
surveillance and identification for cervid chronic wasting disease (CWD) that meets
or exceeds:
(a) The requirements of the Kentucky Cervid CWD Surveillance and
Identification (CCWDSI) Program set forth in this section and in
administrative regulations promulgated by the Kentucky Department of
Agriculture; and
(b) Any other health requirements as regulated by the Kentucky Department of
Agriculture or the United States Department of Agriculture for cervids.
(2) The Kentucky Department of Agriculture shall be responsible for authorizing
importation of the members of the animal family Cervidae into the Commonwealth
that have been subject to a program of surveillance and identification for cervid
CWD that meets or exceeds:
(a) The requirements of the Kentucky CCWDSI Program set forth in this section
and in administrative regulations promulgated by the Kentucky Department of
Agriculture; and
(b) Any other health requirements as regulated by the Kentucky Department of
Agriculture or the United States Department of Agriculture for cervids.
(3) Members of the animal family Cervidae shall not be eligible for importation into
the Commonwealth unless the program of surveillance and identification for cervid
CWD to which they have been subject:
(a) Has been certified by the exporting state's state veterinarian or agency having
jurisdiction over that state's surveillance and identification program;
Page 1 of 9
XXXX 2/18/2025 9:11 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 447
(b) Has been approved by the Kentucky state veterinarian as meeting or
exceeding the standards imposed under the Kentucky CCWDSI Program; and
(c) Meets, at minimum, the following requirements:
1. The program shall require cervid owners to obtain identification and
laboratory diagnosis from brain tissue as directed by the exporting
state's state veterinarian or agency with jurisdiction for cervids twelve
(12) months of age or greater that:
a. Display clinical signs of CWD;
b. Die, including deaths by slaughter or by hunting, including
hunting on hunting preserves; or
c. Are ill or injured regardless of whether the illness or injury results
in death; and
2. The program shall require cervid owners to obtain cervids from herds
that have been monitored for at least five (5) years and that have
complied with the standards contained in the Kentucky CCWDSI
Program.
(4) Cervids originating from a state that has reported a confirmed case of CWD in wild
or captive cervids shall not be imported into Kentucky until The United States
Department of Agriculture approves:
(a) Regulations that allow importation from those states; and
(b) A live test for CWD that is available for live testing of cervids.
(5) Importation of members of the animal family Cervidae into the Commonwealth
shall be consistent with this section and with administrative regulations
promulgated by the Kentucky Department of Agriculture in cooperation with the
Kentucky Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources.
(6) A person shall be guilty of a Class D felony upon conviction for violating this
section. Upon conviction of a second violation of this section and in addition to all
Page 2 of 9
XXXX 2/18/2025 9:11 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 447
other penalties, a person shall be permanently ineligible for renewal of a captive
cervid permit. On or before November 1 of each year, the Department of Fish and
Wildlife Resources and the Department of Agriculture, Office of the State
Veterinarian, respectively shall issue reports to the Interim Joint Committee on
Agriculture and the Interim Joint Committee on Natural Resources and
Environment on the status of chronic wasting disease, and the reports may include
the status of other animal or wildlife diseases in Kentucky and the United States.
The reports shall be used for the purpose of determining the need for modifications
to the statutory ban on the importation of cervids into the Commonwealth.
(7) The Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources shall have the authority to
immediately, and without compensation to the owner, seize captive cervids that
have been imported into the Commonwealth contrary to this section. The individual
whose cervids were seized may request an administrative hearing pursuant to KRS
Chapter 13B within thirty (30) days of the department's seizure and may appeal the
final decision to Franklin Circuit Court in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.
Pending the final outcome of all appeals, the seized cervids may be disposed of by
the department without compensation to the owner.
(8) The department shall have the authority to immediately, and without compensation
to the owner, seize and destroy captive cervids that are in the process of being
imported into the Commonwealth contrary to this section.
(9) A captive cervid originating from outside the Commonwealth of Kentucky which is
in transit, as defined in KRS 150.725 and which is being transported through the
Commonwealth to another state or nation of destination shall meet the entry
requirements of the state or nation of destination.
(10) A person intending to transport a captive cervid through Kentucky shall, prior to the
captive cervid entering Kentucky, obtain a transportation permit from the Office of
the State Veterinarian. This permit shall specify that:
Page 3 of 9
XXXX 2/18/2025 9:11 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 447
(a) A captive cervid being transported through Kentucky shall not remain in
Kentucky for more than twenty-four (24) hours from the time of entry and, if
this requirement cannot be met once the animal is in Kentucky, the Office of
the State Veterinarian shall be contacted to secure a variance to the permit;
(b) A captive cervid being transported through Kentucky shall not leave the
transport vehicle while in Kentucky; and
(c) The person transporting the captive cervid through Kentucky shall follow the
routes specified in the transport permit, if this requirement cannot be met once
the animal is in Kentucky, the Office of the State Veterinarian shall be
contacted to secure a variance to the permit.
(11) (a) A county that encompasses any portion of a thirty (30) mile radius from a
CWD positive detection shall be designated a CWD surveillance zone.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (14) of this section, it shall be unlawful to
export outside of any CWD surveillance zone any portion of a cervid
carcass where a cervid has tested positive for CWD using
immunohistochemistry (IHC) testing.
(c) Any county that encompasses less than ten percent (10%) of that radius
shall be exempt from the prohibition in paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(12) (a) A county that encompasses any portion of a thirty (30) mile radius from a
CWD positive detection shall be designated a CWD surveillance zone.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (14) of this section, it shall be unlawful to
export any wild cervid outside of any CWD surveillance zone where a wild
cervid has tested positive for CWD using immunohistochemistry (IHC)
testing.
(c) Any county that encompasses less than ten percent (10%) of that radius
shall be exempt from the prohibition in paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(13) Except as provided in subsection (14) of this section, it shall be unlawful to export
Page 4 of 9
XXXX 2/18/2025 9:11 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 447
any captive cervid outside of an area that encompasses any portion of a ten (10)
mile radius from a CWD positive captive cervid facility.
(14) Subsections (11) to (13) of this section shall not apply to the following:
(a) Antlers, antlers attached to cleaned skull plates, or cleaned skulls where no
tissue is attached to the skull;
(b) Cleaned teeth;
(c) Finished taxidermy and antler products;
(d) Hides and tanned products;
(e) Boneless meat; and
(f) Tissue collected and handled by an agent of the state for the purposes of
CWD testing as required by the Kentucky Department of Fish and Wildlife
Resources and the Kentucky Department of Agriculture.
(15) Subsection (13) of this section shall not be construed to prohibit the breeding of
captive cervids if the breeding occurs inside the facility in which the captive
cervids are housed and every captive cervid is tagged in accordance with
administrative regulations promulgated by the Kentucky Department of Fish and
Wildlife Resources and the Kentucky Department of Agriculture.
(16) The provisions of subsections (11) to (14) of this section shall remain in effect for
a period of five (5) years from the latest CWD positive detection in an area
identified as CWD positive and shall only expire when the area has remained
CWD free for the entirety of a five (5) year period.
(17) The provisions of subsections (11) to (14) of this section shall not apply to any
CWD positive detections prior to the effective date of this Act.
Section 2. KRS 257.550 is amended to read as follows:
(1) There shall be a ban on the importation of live members of the animal family
Cervidae into the Commonwealth that have not been subject to a program of
surveillance and identification for cervid chronic wasting disease (CWD) that meets
Page 5 of 9
XXXX 2/18/2025 9:11 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 447
or exceeds:
(a) The requirements of the Kentucky Cervid CWD Surveillance and
Identification (CCWDSI) Program set forth in this section and in
administrative regulations promulgated by the Kentucky Department of
Agriculture; and
(b) Any other health requirements as regulated by the Kentucky Department of
Agriculture or the United States Department of Agriculture for cervids.
(2) The Kentucky Department of Agriculture shall be responsible for authorizing
importation of the members of the animal family Cervidae into the Commonwealth
that have been subject to a program of surveillance and identification for cervid
CWD that meets or exceeds:
(a) The requirements of the Kentucky CCWDSI Program set forth in this section
and in administrative regulations promulgated by the Kentucky Department of
Agriculture; and
(b) Any other health requirements as regulated by the Kentucky Department of
Agriculture or the United States Department of Agriculture for cervids.
(3) Members of the animal family Cervidae shall not be eligible for importation into
the Commonwealth unless the program of surveillance and identification for cervid
CWD to which they have been subject:
(a) Has been certified by the exporting state's state veterinarian or agency having
jurisdiction over that state's surveillance and identification program;
(b) Has been approved by the Kentucky state veterinarian as meeting or
exceeding the standards imposed under the Kentucky CCWDSI Program; and
(c) Meets, at a minimum, the following requirements:
1. The program shall require cervid owners to obtain identification and
laboratory diagnosis from brain tissue as directed by the exporting
state's state veterinarian or agency with jurisdiction for cervids twelve
Page 6 of 9
XXXX 2/18/2025 9:11 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 447
(12) months of age or greater that:
a. Display clinical signs of CWD;
b. Die, including deaths by slaughter or by hunting, including
hunting on hunting preserves; or
c. Are ill or injured, regardless of whether the illness or injury results
in death; and
2. The program shall require cervid owners to obtain cervids from herds
that have been monitored for at least five (5) years and that have
complied with the standards contained in the Kentucky CCWDSI
Program.
(4) Cervids originating from a state that has reported a confirmed case of CWD in wild
or captive cervids shall not be imported into Kentucky until the United States
Department of Agriculture approves:
(a) Regulations that allow importation from states with confirmed cases of CWD;
and
(b) A live test for CWD that is available for live testing of cervids.
(5) Importation of members of the animal family Cervidae into the Commonwealth
shall be consistent with this section and with administrative regulations
promulgated by the Kentucky Department of Agriculture in cooperation with the
Kentucky Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources.
(6) (a) A county that encompasses any portion of a thirty (30) mile radius from a
CWD positive detection shall be designated a CWD surveillance zone.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (9) of this section, it shall be unlawful to
export outside of any CWD surveillance zone any portion of a cervid
carcass where a cervid has tested positive for CWD using
immunohistochemistry (IHC) testing.
(c) Any county that encompasses less than ten percent (10%) of that radius
Page 7 of 9
XXXX 2/18/2025 9:11 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 447
shall be exempt from the prohibition in paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(7) (a) A county that encompasses any portion of a thirty (30) mile radius from a
CWD positive detection shall be designated a CWD surveillance zone.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (9) of this section, it shall be unlawful to
export any wild cervid outside of any CWD surveillance zone where a wild
cervid has tested positive for CWD using immunohistochemistry (IHC)
testing.
(c) Any county that encompasses less than ten percent (10%) of that radius
shall be exempt from the prohibition in paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(8) Except as provided in subsection (9) of this section, it shall be unlawful to export
any captive cervid outside of an area that encompasses any portion of a ten (10)
mile radius from a CWD positive captive cervid facility.
(9) Subsections (6) to (8) of this section shall not apply to the following:
(a) Antlers, antlers attached to cleaned skull plates, or cleaned skulls where no
tissue is attached to the skull;
(b) Cleaned teeth;
(c) Finished taxidermy and antler products;
(d) Hides and tanned products;
(e) Boneless meat; and
(f) Tissue collected and handled by an agent of the state for the purposes of
CWD testing as required by the Kentucky Department of Fish and Wildlife
Resources and the Kentucky Department of Agriculture.
(10) Subsection (8) of this section shall not be construed to prohibit the breeding of
captive cervids if the breeding occurs inside the facility in which the captive
cervids are housed and every captive cervid is tagged in accordance with
administrative regulations promulgated by the Kentucky Department of Fish and
Wildlife Resources and the Kentucky Department of Agriculture.
Page 8 of 9
XXXX 2/18/2025 9:11 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 447
(11) The provisions of subsections (6) to (8) of this section shall remain in effect for a
period of five (5) years from the latest CWD positive detection in an area
identified as CWD positive and shall only expire when the area has remained
CWD free for the entirety of a five (5) year period.
(12) The provisions of subsections (6) to (8) of this section shall not apply to any CWD
positive detections prior to the effective date of this Act.
Page 9 of 9
XXXX 2/18/2025 9:11 PM Jacketed